Washington statutes.
RCW 7.100.020

Notice to mortgage servicer of nuisance.

(1) A county, city, or town may notify a mortgage servicer that a property has been determined to be abandoned, in mid-foreclosure, and a nuisance.

(2) A notice issued pursuant to this section must:

(a) Be accompanied by an affidavit or a declaration made under penalty of perjury by a county, city, or town official that a property is abandoned, in mid-foreclosure, and a nuisance, and the affidavit or declaration must outline at least three indicators of abandonment and be supported with time and date stamped photographs, a finding that the property is a nuisance, and a copy of the notice of default, notice of preforeclosure options, or notice of trustee's sale; and

(b) Be sent to the mortgage servicer by certified mail.

[ 2018 c 306 s 11.]